Washington statutes.
RCW 15.92.020

Center established.

A center for sustaining agriculture and natural resources is established at Washington State University. The center shall provide statewide leadership in research, extension, and resident instruction programs to sustain agriculture and natural resources.

[ 1991 c 341 s 3.]